Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 10 Imprisonment on Civil Process

10-10-1.
Grounds for writ commanding arrest.

At the commencement of a civil action, a writ, commanding the arrest of any person not exempt by law from arrest, shall be issued from the superior court or from any district court only after application to a justice thereof, who may, in his or her discretion, order the issuance of the writ and who shall endorse such order in writing on the face of the writ:

In any action on penal statutes, or in any action sounding in tort, except replevin, or against bail in criminal cases.

Whenever the plaintiff in the action, his or her agent or attorney, shall make affidavit, to be endorsed on the writ or annexed to the writ, that the plaintiff has a just claim against the defendant, that is due, upon which the plaintiff expects to recover in the action a sum sufficient to give jurisdiction to the court to which the writ is returnable; and also either that the defendant to be arrested is about to leave the state, without leaving therein real or personal estate whereon an execution that may be obtained in such action can be served, and, in case the defendant is not a resident of the state, that the plaintiff, or if more than one plaintiff, that some of the plaintiffs are actual residents of the state, or that the defendant to be arrested has committed fraud in fact involving moral turpitude or intentional wrong, either in contracting the debt upon which the action is founded or in the concealment of his or her property or in the disposition of the property; provided, that whenever an arrest shall be made in accordance with the second clause of this section, the court to which the writ is made returnable, or any justice thereof, may by order, upon application of any defendant so arrested, and for cause shown upon hearing the parties therein, release the defendant from the arrest and discharge the bail taken thereon, if any; but the action shall not be dismissed on account of the release and discharge, but may be prosecuted to final judgment in the same manner as if no release and discharge had been granted.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 507; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 11; G.L. 1038, ch. 559, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-10-1

; P.L. 1961, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 53.

10-10-2.
Form of writ from superior court.

An original writ of arrest issued from the superior court shall be substantially in the following form:

THE STATE OF RHODE ISLAND. SC. To the sheriffs of our several counties, or to their deputies, (SEAL) Greeting: We command you to arrest the body of of , if to be found in your precinct, and in safe custody keep, to answer the complaint of of
on the return day hereof (said return day being the day of A.D. 20) in the SUPERIOR COURT to be holden at the county courthouse at , in an action of as by declaration to be filed in court will be fully set forth, to the damage of the plaintiff, as he or she says, dollars. Hereof fail not, and make true return of this writ with your doings thereon. Witness, the seal of our superior court, at this
day of
in the year . , Clerk.

Click to view

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 508; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 559, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-10-2

; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 10, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 10, effective June 23, 2021.

10-10-3.
Form of writ from district court.

An original writ of arrest issued from a district court shall be substantially in the following form:

THE STATE OF RHODE ISLAND. SC. To the sheriff of the county of , his or her deputies, or to either of the town sergeants or constables in said county, (SEAL) Greeting: We command you to arrest the body of of , if to be found in your precinct, and in safe custody keep, to answer the complaint of of , (The remainder as in a writ of summons.)

Click to view

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 509; G.L. 1909, ch. 299, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 349, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 559, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-10-3

; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 10, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 10, effective June 23, 2021.

10-10-4.
Exemption of females from arrest on contract.

No female shall be arrested on original writ in any action founded on contract.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 597; G.L. 1909, ch. 302, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 352, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 560, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-10-4

.

10-10-5.
Exemption of voters at time of elections.

No person entitled to vote shall be liable to arrest upon any civil process on the days of election of city or town officers, of state officers, representatives in congress, or of electors of president and vice-president of the United States, or on the day preceding or on the day following the election.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 598; G.L. 1909, ch. 302, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 352, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 560, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-10-5

.

10-10-6.
Exemption of persons on military duty.

No officer, noncommissioned officer, or private shall be arrested on civil process while going to, or coming from, or remaining at any place which he or she shall have been ordered to attend for the election of any military officer or the performance of any military duty.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 599; G.L. 1909, ch. 302, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 352, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 560, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-10-6

.

10-10-7.
Custody of person arrested.

Every officer who shall arrest any person by virtue of any writ of arrest, in a civil action, shall keep the person in safe custody until he or she is discharged pursuant to law.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 527; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 561, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-10-7

.

10-10-8.
Notation of cause of action on execution and commitment.

Every clerk of any court, issuing an execution against any person, shall note on the margin of the execution the cause of action on which the execution issued, to the end that the warden of the adult correctional institutions may ascertain whether the person, if committed, is entitled to the liberty of the jail yard, and every officer committing any person to correctional institutions on such execution shall note in his or her commitment the cause of action on which the execution is founded, according to the note or memorandum of the clerk.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-10-8

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 21.

10-10-9.
Privileges allowed person committed in absence of memorandum.

If no memorandum as described in §

10-10-8

is made by the clerk on any execution, or if the officer shall not note the cause of action as provided in §

10-10-8

in his or her commitment, the warden of the adult correctional institutions shall be held harmless if he or she permits the person committed to have the liberty of the jail yard, or discharge him or her, on his or her producing a certificate of having taken the oath prescribed by law for poor debtors.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 14; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-10-9

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 21; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 32.

10-10-10.
Validity of assignments made by prisoner.

All assignments, transfers, and conveyances of property made by a debtor during his or her imprisonment, for the payment or security of any debt, except that of the committing creditor, shall be utterly void, unless made for the benefit of all his or her creditors in proportion to their respective demands.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

10-10-10

.

10-10-11.
Bonds and obligations not provided for void.

If any deputy sheriff, town sergeant, constable or the warden of the adult correctional institutions shall take or receive from any prisoner in his or her custody any bond, obligation, covenant, promise, or assurance whatsoever, to indemnify and save harmless the person taking the bond, obligation, covenant, promise, or assurance for the enlargement or ease of the prisoner, in any other form or manner than is prescribed by law for taking bail on mesne process in a civil action, or is prescribed in this chapter or chapter 12 of this title, every such bond, obligation, covenant, promise or assurance whatsoever, shall be utterly void.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 16; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-10-11

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 25.

10-10-12.
Payment of prisoner’s board.

Whenever any person shall be imprisoned in or committed to the adult correctional institution upon original writ, mesne process, execution, or surrender or commitment by bail, in any action whatsoever, the party at whose suit the person is imprisoned, or committed for the benefit of or at the request of the United States of America shall pay to the warden of the institution in which he or she is imprisoned or committed the sum of two hundred ten dollars ($210), per week in advance for the board of the prisoner or person, reckoning the board from the time of the commitment; which payment in advance shall continue to be made by the creditor or the United States of America during the time the person shall be detained at his or her suit; provided, however, that in all cases in which any person shall be imprisoned under an original writ, mesne process, execution against the body or because of surrender or commitment by bail, in any suit in favor of the state and in all cases where the person is held in civil or criminal contempt by any court of the state, or any commitment under §

15-5-16

, no board need be demanded by or paid to the warden. Provided, further, however, that in all applicable cases of commitment, the party so committing shall pay the board in advance until one week after notice in writing of the commitment shall have been duly served upon the party, or his or her attorney of record, by any member of the division of sheriffs, or other duly qualified officer and lodged with the warden of the institution where the person is committed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1152; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-10-12

; P.L. 1975, ch. 40, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 32; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 25.

10-10-13.
Discharge of prisoner on default in board payments.

In case of default made in payment of the prisoner’s board, as required in §

10-10-12

, the warden shall discharge such prisoner from the institution, stating in his or her formal discharge on the records of the institution the reason for the discharge.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-10-13

.

10-10-14.
Board payments as costs.

The amount thus paid by the creditor, for the board of the prisoner so imprisoned at his or her suit, shall be added to and form a part of the costs of commitment and detention; and as such costs, shall be paid by the prisoner in the then existing or any future proceedings which may be lawfully instituted against him or her for the recovery of the debt and costs of the suit against him or her.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-10-14

.